District of Columbia statutes.
10-304

Park adoptions and sponsorships.

(a)

Individuals, associations, corporations, partnerships, neighborhood and civic groups, nonprofit organizations, or other governmental entities may adopt or sponsor Departmental programs, sites, facilities, fields, or operations. The form of such adoption or sponsorship may be made by a donation of funds to the Fund, services, equipment, or any other asset with intrinsic value. The Department may form partnerships with any of the above stated groups to accomplish a stated goal or mission of the Department.

(b)

The Department shall, within 1 year from March 23, 1995, promulgate regulations appropriate for the full implementation of this chapter including regulations related to park adoptions and sponsorships, vending and concessions fees, and permits.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 5, 42 DCR 452
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 20(b), 43 DCR 530
Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-68, § 3, 62 DCR 16266
This section is referenced in § 10-303.
1981 Ed., § 8-304.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-68 substituted “neighborhood and civic groups, nonprofit organizations, or other governmental entities may adopt or sponsor Departmental programs, sites, facilities, fields, or operations” for “neighborhood and civic groups or other governmental entities may adopt or sponsor Departmental programs, sites, or operations” in (a).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-301.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-302, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2171).